Massachusetts, session 194th, H4583.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: In the city of Salem, the positions of Harbormaster and Assistant
Harbormaster who have statutory powers of law enforcement and are sworn City of Salem
Special Police Officers shall be Group 4 employees pursuant to M.G.L. c. 32, § 3(2)(g).
Notwithstanding any provision in M.G.L. c. 32, §§ 1-28, inclusive to the contrary, all prior
creditable service rendered before the effective date of this act rendered by eligible Harbormaster
and Assistant Harbormasters as of the date of this act will be considered Group 4 service.
Section 2: This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1